Utah statutes.
77-16a-202.   Person found guilty with a mental illness -- Commitment to department -- Admission to Utah State Hospital.

(1)  In sentencing and committing an offender with a mental illness to the department under Subsection 77-16a-104(3)(a), the court shall:

(a)  sentence the offender to a term of imprisonment and order that he be committed to the department and admitted to the Utah State Hospital for care and treatment until transferred to UDC in accordance with Sections 77-16a-203 and 77-16a-204, making provision for readmission to the Utah State Hospital whenever the requirements and conditions of Section 77-16a-204 are met; or

(b)  sentence the offender to a term of imprisonment and order that the offender be committed to the department for care and treatment for no more than 18 months, or until the offender's condition has been stabilized to the point that commitment to the department and admission to the Utah State Hospital is no longer necessary to ensure adequate mental health treatment, whichever occurs first.  At the expiration of that time, the court may recall the sentence and commitment, and resentence the offender.  A commitment and retention of jurisdiction under this Subsection (1)(b) shall be specified in the sentencing order.  If that specification is not included in the sentencing order, the offender shall be committed in accordance with Subsection (1)(a).

(2)  The court may not retain jurisdiction, under Subsection (1)(b), over the sentence of an offender with a mental illness who has been convicted of a capital felony.  In capital cases, the court shall make the findings required by this section after the capital sentencing proceeding mandated by Section 76-3-207.

(3)  When an offender is committed to the department and admitted to the Utah State Hospital under Subsection (1)(b), the department shall provide the court with reports of the offender's mental health status every six months.  Those reports shall be prepared in accordance with the requirements of Section 77-16a-203.  Additionally, the court may appoint an independent examiner to assess the mental health status of the offender.

(4)  The period of commitment to the department and admission to the Utah State Hospital, and any subsequent retransfers to the Utah State Hospital made pursuant to Section 77-16a-204 may not exceed the maximum sentence imposed by the court.  Upon expiration of that sentence, the administrator of the facility where the offender is located may initiate civil proceedings for involuntary commitment in accordance with Title 62A, Chapter 5, Services for People with Disabilities, or Title 62A, Chapter 15, Substance Abuse and Mental Health Act.



Amended by Chapter 366, 2011 General Session

